nl: Accessoiregrootte: Compact; Aanpasbaar; Dubbel extra groot (XXL); Dubbel extra klein (XXS); Extra groot (XL); Extra lang; Extra kort; Extra klein (XS); Vijf extra groot (5XL); Vier extra groot (4XL); Groot (L); Lang; Middel (M); Een maat; Normaal; Kort; Zes extra groot (6XL); Klein (S); Standaard; Reisgrootte; Driedubbel extra groot (XXXL); Driedubbel extra klein (XXXS); Andere
vi: Kích cỡ phụ kiện: Nhỏ gọn; Có thể tùy chỉnh; Rất rất lớn (XXL); Cực cực nhỏ (XXS); Rất lớn (XL); Rất dài; Rất ngắn; Rất nhỏ (XS); 5 cực lớn (5XL); 4 cực lớn (4XL); Lớn (L); Dài; Trung bình (M); Một cỡ; Thông thường (R); Ngắn; 6 cực lớn (6XL); Nhỏ (S); Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Cỡ nhỏ gọn; Siêu lớn (XXXL); 3 cực nhỏ (XXXS); Khác
da: Tilbehørsstørrelse: Kompakt; Brugerdefinerbar; XXL; XXS; XL; Ekstra lang; Ekstra kort; XS; 5XL; 4XL; Large (L); Lang; Medium (M); One-size; Almindelig (R); Kort; 6XL; Small (S); Standard; Rejsestørrelse; XXXL; XXXS; Andet
sl-SI: Velikost dodatka: Kompaktna; Prilagodljiva; Dvojna ekstra velika (XXL); Dvojna ekstra majhna (XXS); Ekstra velika (XL); Ekstra dolga; Ekstra kratka; Ekstra majhna (XS); Petkratna ekstra velika (5XL); Štirikratna ekstra velika (4XL); Velika (L); Dolga; Srednja (M); Ena velikost; Običajna (R); Kratka; Šestkratna ekstra velika (6XL); Majhna (S); Standardna; Potovalna velikost; Trojna ekstra velika (XXXL); Trojna ekstra majhna (XXXS); Druga
nb: Tilbehørsstørrelse: Kompakt; Tilpassbar; Dobbel ekstra stor (XXL); Dobbel ekstra liten (XXS); Ekstra stor (XL); Ekstra lang; Ekstra kort; Ekstra liten (XS); Fem ekstra stor (5XL); Fire ekstra stor (4XL); Stor (L); Lang; Middels (M); Én størrelse; Vanlig (R); Kort; Seks ekstra stor (6XL); Liten (S); Standard; Reisestørrelse; Trippel ekstra stor (XXXL); Trippel ekstra liten (XXXS); Annet
lt-LT: Priedo dydis: Kompaktiškas; Pasirenkamas; 2XL (XXL); 2XS (XXS); Itin didelis (XL); Itin ilgas; Itin trumpas; Itin mažas (XS); XXXXXL (5XL); XXXXL (4XL); Didelis (L); Ilgas; Vidutinis (M); Universalus; Įprastas (R); Trumpas; XXXXXXL (6XL); Mažas (S); Standartinis; Kelioninis dydis; 3XL (XXXL); 3XS (XXXS); Kita
hu: Tartozék mérete: Kompakt; Testreszabható; XXL (2XL); XXS (2XS); XL; Extra hosszú; Extra rövid; XS; 5XL; 4XL; Nagy (L); Hosszú; Közepes (M); Egy méret; Normál (R); Rövid; 6XL; Kicsi (S); Normál; Utazási méret; XXXL; XXXS; Egyéb
de: Zubehörgröße: Kompakt; Anpassbar; XXL; XXS; XL; Extra lang; Extra kurz; XS; 5XL; 4XL; L; Lang; M; Einheitsgröße; Regulär (R); Kurz; 6XL; S; Standard; Reisegröße; XXXL; XXXS; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tamanho dos acessórios: Compacto; Personalizável; Duplo extra grande (XXL); Duplo extra pequeno (XXS); Extra grande (XL); Extra comprido; Extra curto; Extra pequeno (XS); Cinco extra grande (5XL); Quatro extra grande (4XL); Grande (L); Comprido; Médio (M); Tamanho único; Regular (R); Curto; Seis extra grande (6XL); Pequeno (S); Padrão; Tamanho de viagem; Triplo extra grande (XXXL); Triplo extra pequeno (XXXS); Outro
fr: Taille de l’accessoire: Compact; Personnalisable; Double XL (XXL); Double très petit (XXS); Extra large (XL); Très long; Très court; Très petite taille (XS); Cinq très grand (5XL); Quatre extra larges (4XL); Taille large (L); Long; Taille moyenne (M); Taille unique; Normal; Courte; Six extra larges (6XL); Petite taille (S); Standard; Format voyage; Triple XL (XXL); Triple très petit (XXS); Autre
es: Tamaño de accesorio: Compacto; Personalizable; Doble extragrande (XXL); Doble extrapequeño (XXS); Extragrande (XL); Extralargo; Extracorto; Extrapequeño (XS); Cinco extragrande (5XL); Cuatro extragrande (4XL); Grande (L); Largo; Mediano (M); Talla única; Regular (R); Corto; Seis extragrande (6XL); Pequeño (S); Estándar; Tamaño de viaje; Triple extragrande (XXXL); Triple extrapequeño (XXXS); Otros
fi: Lisävarusteen koko: Kompakti; Muokattavissa; Erittäin erittäin suuri (XXL); XXS; Erittäin suuri (XL); Erittäin pitkä; Erittäin lyhyt; Erittäin pieni (XS); XXXXXL; XXXXL; Suuri (L); Pitkä; Keskikokoinen (M); Yksi koko; Tavallinen; Lyhyt; XXXXXXL; Pieni (S); Tavallinen; Matkakoko; 3 erittäin suuri (XXXL); XXXS; Muu
pt-BR: Tamanho do acessório: Compacto; Personalizável; Duplo extra grande (XXG); Duplo extra pequeno (XXS); Extra grande (XG); Extra longo; Extra curto; Extra pequeno (XP); Cinco extra grande (5XL); Quatro extra grande (4XL); Grande (G); Longo; Médio (M); Tamanho único; Regular (R); Curto; Seis extra grande (6XL); Pequeno (P); Padrão; Tamanho para viagem; Triplo extra grande (XXXG); Triplo extra pequeno (SXXS); Outro
ro-RO: Dimensiune accesoriu: Compact; Personalizabil; Double extra large (XXL); Double extra small (XXS); Extra large (XL); Extra long; Extra short; Extra small (XS); Five extra large (5XL); Four extra large (4XL); Large (L); Lung; Medium (M); Mărime universală; Regular (R); Scurt; Six extra large (6XL); Small (S); Standard; Dimensiune de voiaj; Triple extra large (XXXL); Triple extra small (XXXS); Altele
zh-CN: 配件尺寸: 压缩式; 可定制; 超特大号 (XXL); 超特小号 (XXS); 特大号 (XL); 超长; 超短; 特小号 (XS); 五加特大号 (5XL); 四加特大号 (4XL); 大号 (L); 长; 中号 (M); 均码; 常规 (R); 短; 六加特大号 (6XL); 小号 (S); 标准; 旅行装; 三加特大号 (XXL); 三加特小号 (XXXS); 其他
th: ขนาดเครื่องประดับ: แบบกะทัดรัด; ปรับแต่งได้; ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษสองเท่า (XXL); ขนาดเล็กพิเศษสองเท่า (XXS); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ (XL); ยาวเป็นพิเศษ; สั้นเป็นพิเศษ; ขนาดเล็กพิเศษ (XS); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษห้าเท่า (5XL); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษสี่เท่า (4XL); ขนาดใหญ่ (L); ยาว; ขนาดกลาง (M); ไซส์เดียว; ไซส์ปกติ (R); สั้น; ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษหกเท่า (6XL); ขนาดเล็ก (S); มาตรฐาน; ขนาดพกพา; ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษสามเท่า (XXXL); ขนาดเล็กพิเศษสามเท่า (XXXS); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Veličina dodatka: Kompaktna; Podesiva; Dvostruko ekstra veliko (XXL); Dvostruko ekstra malo (XXS); Ekstra veliko (XL); Ekstra dugo; Ekstra kratko; Ekstra malo (XS); Peterostruko ekstra veliko (5XL); Četverostruko ekstra veliko (4XL); Veliko (L); Dugo; Srednje (M); Univerzalna veličina; Regularno (R); Kratko; Šesterostruko ekstra veliko (6XL); Malo (S); Standardno; Putna veličina; Trostruko ekstra veliko (XXXL); Trostruko ekstra malo (XXS); Ostalo
ru: Размер аксессуара: Компактный; Регулируемый; Двойной очень большой (XXL); Двойной очень маленький (XXS); Очень большой (XL); Очень длинный; Очень короткий; Очень маленький (XS); Пятый очень большой (5XL); Четвертый очень большой (4XL); Большой (L); Длинный; Средний (М); Безразмерный; Стандартный (R); Короткий; Шестой очень большой (6XL); Маленький (S); Стандартный; Компактный; Тройной очень большой (XXXL); Тройной очень маленький (XXXS); Другое
bg-BG: Размер на аксесоара: Компактен; Възможност за персонализиране; Двойно екстра голямо (XXL); Двойно екстра малко (XXS); Екстра голямо (XL); Екстра дълго; Екстра късо; Екстра малко (XS); Пет екстра голямо (5XL); Четири екстра голямо (4XL); Голямо (L); Дълго; Средно (M); Един размер; Нормално (R); Късо; Шест екстра голямо (6XL); Малко (S); Стандартно; Размер за пътуване; Тройно екстра голямо (XXL); Тройно екстра малко (XXS); Други
sk-SK: Veľkosť príslušenstva: Kompaktný; Prispôsobiteľný; Dvojitý extra veľký (XXL); Dvojitý extra malý (XXS); Extra veľký (XL); Extra dlhý; Extra krátky; Extra malý (XS); Päť extra veľký (5XL); Štyri extra veľký (4XL); Veľký (L); Dlhý; Stredný (M); Jedna veľkosť; Bežný (R); Krátky; Šesť extra veľký (6XL); Malý (S); Štandardný; Cestovná veľkosť; Trojitý extra veľký (XXXL); Trojitý extra malý (XXXS); Iné
sv: Tillbehörsstorlek: Kompakt; Anpassningsbar; Dubbel extra large (XXL); Dubbel extra small (XXS); Extra large (XL); Extra lång; Extra kort; Extra small (XS); Fem extra large (5XL); Fyra extra large (4XL); Large (L); Lång; Medium (M); En storlek; Reguljär (R); Kort; Sex extra large (6XL); Small (S); Standard; Resestorlek; Tredubbel extra large (XXXL); Tredubbel extra small (XXXS); Övrigt
pl: Rozmiar akcesoriów: Kompaktowy; Konfigurowalne; Double extra large (XXL); Rozmiar XXS; Extra large (XL); Bardzo długi; Bardzo krótki; Extra small (XS); Rozmiar 5XL; Rozmiar 4XL; Large (L); Długie; Medium (M); Jeden rozmiar; Standardowy (S); Krótkie; Rozmiar 6XL; Small (S); Standard; Rozmiar podróżny; Triple extra large (XXXL); Rozmiar XXXS; Inne
tr: Aksesuar Boyutu: Kompakt; Özelleştirilebilir; İki X large (XXL); İki X small (XXS); X large (XL); Ekstra uzun; Ekstra kısa; X small (XS); Beş X large (5XL); Dört X large (4XL); Large (L); Uzun; Medium (M); Tek beden; Normal (R); Kısa; Altı X large (6XL); Small (S); Standart; Seyahat boyu; Üç X large (XXXL); Üç X small (XXXS); Diğer
it: Dimensioni dell'accessorio: Compatta; Personalizzabile; Doppia XL (XXL); Doppia XS (XXS); Extra large (XL); Extra lungo; Extra corto; Extra small (XS); Cinque XL (5XL); Quattro XL (4XL); Large (L); Lungo; Medium (M); Taglia unica; Regular (R); Corta; Sei XL (6XL); Small (S); Standard; Formato da viaggio; Tripla XL (XXXL); Tripla XS (XXXS); Altro
zh-TW: 配件尺寸: 小巧; 可客製化; 超特大號 (XXL); 超特小號 (XXS); 特大號 (XL); 加長版; 縮小版; 特小號 (XS); 五倍特大號 (5XL); 四倍特大號 (4XL); 大號 (L); 長; 中號（M）; 單一尺碼; 常規 (R); 短; 六倍特大號 (6XL); 小 (S); 標準; 便攜式尺寸; 超特大號 (XXXL); 三倍特小號 (XXXS); 其他
ko: 액세서리 크기: 콤팩트; 맞춤형; 2XL(XXL); 2XS(XXS); XL(XL); 엑스트라 롱; 엑스트라 쇼트; XS(XS); 5XL(5XL); 4XL(4XL); 라지(L); 롱; 미디엄(M); 단일 사이즈; 레귤러(R); 짧은; 6XL(6XL); 스몰(S); 표준; 여행용 크기; 3XL(XXXL); 3XS(XXXS); 기타
el: Μέγεθος αξεσουάρ: Μικρών διαστάσεων; Προσαρμόσιμο; Δύο extra large (XXL); Δύο extra small (XXS); Extra large (XL); Πολύ μακρύ; Πολύ κοντό; Extra small (XS); Πέντε extra large (5XL); Τέσσερα extra large (4XL); Large (L); Μακρύ; Medium (M); One size; Regular (R); Κοντό; Έξι extra large (6XL); Small (S); Κανονικό; Μέγεθος ταξιδίου; Τρία extra large (XXXL); Τρία extra small (XXXS); Άλλο
ja: アクセサリーのサイズ: コンパクト; カスタマイズ可能; ダブルエクストララージ (XXL); ダブルエクストラスモール (XXS); エクストララージ (XL); エクストラロング; エクストラショート; エクストラスモール (XS); 5エクストララージ (5XL); 4エクストララージ (4XL); ラージ (L); ロング; ミディアム (M); ワンサイズ; レギュラー (R); ショート; 6エクストララージ (6XL); スモール (S); スタンダード; トラベルサイズ; トリプルエクストララージ (XXXL); トリプルエクストラスモール (XXXS); その他
cs: Velikost doplňku/příslušenství: Kompaktní; Přizpůsobitelné; Velmi velmi velké (XXL); Velmi velmi malé (XXS); Velmi velké (XL); Velmi dlouhé; Velmi krátké; Velmi malé (XS); Velmi velmi velmi velmi velmi velké (5XL); Velmi velmi velmi velmi velké (4XL); Velké (L); Dlouhé; Střední (M); Jedna velikost; Běžné (R); Krátký; Velmi velmi velmi velmi velmi velmi velké (6XL); Malé (S); Standardní; Cestovní velikost; Velmi velmi velmi velké (XXXL); Velmi velmi velmi malé (XXS); Jiné
en: Accessory size: Compact; Customizable; Double extra large (XXL); Double extra small (XXS); Extra large (XL); Extra long; Extra short; Extra small (XS); Five extra large (5XL); Four extra large (4XL); Large (L); Long; Medium (M); One size; Regular (R); Short; Six extra large (6XL); Small (S); Standard; Travel size; Triple extra large (XXXL); Triple extra small (XXXS); Other